District of Columbia statutes.
29-803.01

No agency power of member as member.

(a)

A member shall not be an agent of a limited liability company solely by reason of being a member.

(b)

A person’s status as a member shall not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited liability company because of the person’s conduct.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 301 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).